Mississippi, session 2026, SB3407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Chapter 911, Local and Private Laws of 1989, is amended as follows: Section 1.  The Board of Supervisors of Jackson County, Mississippi, is hereby authorized, in its discretion, to create a county fair board and to appoint five (5) members thereto.  Each member of the county fair board shall be a qualified elector of the county and there shall be one (1) member from each supervisor's district.  The terms of the members shall be concurrent with the terms of members of the board of supervisors and each member shall receive a per diem for each meeting attended as may be provided by the board of supervisors.  The fair board shall elect one (1) of its members to serve as chairman and one (1) other member to serve as * * * treasurer.  The treasurer shall give bond payable to the county in such amount as the board of supervisors shall require secretary. The board of supervisors shall have the power to remove any member of the county fair board for inefficiency, incompetency or for any other cause. Section 2.  The Board of Supervisors of Jackson County may annually allocate * * * and pay to the county fair board such funds as the board of supervisors, in its discretion, determines necessary to properly promote, plan, organize and implement a county fair or fairs, including competitive events, carnival-type shows and other activities normally associated with county fairs, the farmers' market and related activities.  The county fair board may promulgate and recommend to the board of supervisors rules and regulations relating to the use of the county fairground facilities and may, if the board of supervisors approves such rules and regulations, implement and enforce such rules and regulations. * * *  The board of supervisors, in its discretion, may authorize the county fair board to manage and maintain the county facilities on the fairgrounds property of the county. The fair board shall devote all moneys appropriated to it by the board of supervisors and all moneys it receives by gift or from any other source whatsoever for the payment of operating expenses incidental to the conducting of the fair and related activities, for the payment of the maintenance, operating expenses, purchase of equipment, erection, construction, repair and replacement of buildings, and for the promotion and extension of excellence in farming, livestock production, creative arts and crafts for the home, self‑enrichment, clothing and food preservation and other activities traditionally associated with county fairs and the farmers' market. The fair board * * * shall have full jurisdiction of all funds coming into its possession by appropriation of the board of supervisors, by gift or by revenue derived from the operation of the fair and fair facilities, and shall have authority to make all contracts in relation * * * thereto to the county fair and the fair facilities. The fair board shall have authority to establish bylaws for the holding and conducting of its meetings and to promulgate such rules and regulations as it deems necessary for the safe, economic and efficient management of the county fair and related activities for all the citizens of the county. Section 3.  The county fair board shall have authority, subject to approval by the board of supervisors, to employ such advisory and/or administrative staff to be selected equally from each supervisor's district and may employ, subject to approval by the board of supervisors, such additional employees as may be necessary to conduct fair activities * * * and to maintain the farmers' market and the county fairgrounds.  The county fair board shall have the right * * * to fix the salaries of all employees it hires, to direct * * * them employees in the discharge of their duties and to discharge staff and employees for inefficiency or for other good cause. * * *  The county fair board, upon approval by the board of supervisors, shall have complete control and management of the county fairgrounds property. The county fair board shall have the power to operate concessions and use fairground facilities for the sale of soft drinks, confections, popcorn, peanuts or similar items and may charge and collect fees and lease buildings and fairground facilities to others for such purposes as set forth by the board of supervisors. Section 4. * * *  The county fair board is authorized to insure all fairground property against loss by fire and tornado and to carry property damage and other miscellaneous casualty or liability insurance as the fair board deems proper, the premiums therefor to be paid out of funds appropriated by the board of supervisors or revenues derived in the operation of the fairgrounds.  The county fair board may also serve as a recommending body to the board of supervisors regarding the use of the fairgrounds for large-scale events or promotions. Section 5. * * *  The conduct of business and all purchases and contracts made and entered into by a fair board created under this act shall be governed by the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 19, Mississippi Code of 1972.  The county fair board shall purchase all supplies for the fair in the manner now provided by law for the purchase of such supplies by the board of supervisors, and shall issue vouchers in payment therefor.  The fair board shall report quarterly to the board of supervisors all of its actions and transactions of every kind, and shall make a complete statement of the financial condition of the county fair board at the end of each quarter.  The fair board shall annually make a detailed statement covering the * * * entire management and operation of annual Jackson County Fair or other activities at the fairground facilities and may make any recommendations which it may have for further development of the fairgrounds. Section 6.  This act shall be liberally construed to promote the efficient operation of the fair and the fairground facilities of the county to the end that all activities of the county fair board result in the improvement of all activities conducted for all citizens of the county. Section 7.  The board of supervisors is hereby authorized and empowered to set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the county general fund for the purpose of conducting, supporting and maintaining all fair and fairground activities and facilities in the county, and the funds so appropriated shall be used for no purpose except as provided in this act. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.